src/fst/morphology/phonology.xfscript
# Outside of TAMA-initial contexts, /i/ assimilates to the height and backness
# of any immediately preceding /a/, /o/, or /u/, but retains its tone and mora.
define iAssimilation í -> á, i -> a, ì -> à || [á|a|à] _ .o.
                     í -> ó, i -> o, ì -> ò || [ó|o|ò] _ .o.
                     í -> ú, i -> u, ì -> ù || [ú|u|ù] _;

# When /i/ appears before an /i/ in a TAMA chunk (e.g., with indefinite object
# i-), then we need to make sure that the first /i/ picks up the tone and
# length of the TAMA chunk.
define iTAMAAssimilation                  í "." i i -> í í   .o.
                          [ í "." [í|i] | i "." í ] -> í     .o.
                                          i "." i   -> i     .o.
                                          i "." i2  -> i2;

# When /u/ appears before an /i/ or /ii/ in a TAMA chunk (e.g., with areal
# gu-), then we need to make sure that the /u/ picks up the tone and length
# from the /i/.
define uTAMAAssimilation [ u "." i i | ú "." ì ì | ù "." í í ]  -> u u  .o.
                         [ u "." í í | ú "." í í | ú "." i i ]  -> ú ú  .o.
                         [ u "." ì ì | ù "." i i | ù "." ì ì ]  -> ù ù  .o.
                         [ u "." i | ú "." ì | ù "." í ]        -> u    .o.
                         [ u "." í | ú "." í | ú "." i ]        -> ú    .o.
                         [ u "." ì | ù "." i | ù "." ì ]        -> ù;

# When /a/ appears before /ii/ or /i/ in a TAMA chunk (e.g., with the inner
# prefix ná- in násʔí "look at"), we need to make sure that the /a/ becomes
# long before /ii/ and picks up the appropriate tone.
define aTAMAAssimilation [ á "." í í | á "." i i | á "." á á ] -> á á  .o.
                         [ á "." í   | á "." i   | á "." á   ] -> á    .o.
                           a "." í                             -> á    .o.
                           a "." i i                           -> a a  .o.
                           a "." i                             -> a    .o.
                           à "." i i                           -> à à  .o.
                           à "." i                             -> à;

# In complex prefix combinations, we can sometimes end up with a sequence
# of three adjacent vowels (e.g., dà- í- isaà-, as in daásaàzi "we are all
# calling him/her/it"). After vowel and tone assimilation has taken place,
# we can safely drop the final vowel in these sequences.
define noThreeVowelSequences vowel -> 0 || vowel vowel _;

# /u/ before /a/ is realized as a glide, but may still contribute a high tone
# to the following vowel.  Change uá -> wá, ua -> wa, uà -> wà (mid-tone u,
# e.g., gwàgúdìlo "someone is sick" < gu- àgúdìlo), as well as úá -> wá, 
# úa -> wá (high-tone u, e.g., kwásdàł "you (pl.) go in" < kú- asdàł).
# 
# (Phoneticlaly, /wa/ can be realized as [wa] or [ɔa]~[ɔˑ], but this isn't
# represented orthographically).
define uGliding u -> w || _ [á|a|à] .o. ú [a|á] -> w á;

# Change iò -> ò, io -> o, ió -> ó (e.g., mi-oghà -> moghà) and uò -> ò,
# uo -> o, uó -> ó (e.g., gu-oghà -> goghà; both cases mostly apply to oblique
# object markers, where this phonological context typically arises).
define uDeletionBeforeO u -> 0 || _ [ó|o|ò];

# 2PL <as2> doesn't contribute a mora to any preceding prefix, (e.g., dàłí
# "you (pl.) are" < dà- ałí, rather than *dàałí), but it does still cause
# manner assimilation (e.g., dastł'áh "you (pl.) run" < di- astłáh).
define assimilationBefore2PL í -> á, i -> a, ì -> à || _ [á|a|à] s2;
# TODO: what to do with às2-? (depends on treatment of transitional ì-)
define reduce2PLAfterVowel a -> 0 || vowel _ s2;

# Short /i/ deletes before non-/i/ vowels.
define iDeletionBeforeOtherVowels i -> 0 || _ [á|a|à|ó|o|ò|ú|u|ù];


#
# FST-internal symbol mangling.
#

# Some lexical entries include "^L" immediately before the inner-prefix
# boundary marker "." (e.g., "ta=di^L.ʔò"), rather than as part of one of the
# inflectional classes that produce "^L" after that marker (e.g., isi-PFV).
# Shifting the "^L" to always appear after that boundary marker makes several
# of the other tone-related rules defined here more straightforward to apply.
define putLToneAfterInnerPrefixBoundaryMarker "^L" "." -> "." "^L";

# Remove any unmarked, non-tone-bearing vowels (i.e., /i/) from the ends of
# prefixes that immediately precede vowel-initial TAMA chunks (e.g., di .
# is tł'áh -> d . is tł'áh).  This step makes it much easier to deal with
# the morphophonology that happens at the point where the inner prefixes meet
# the TAMA chunks.
define shortenDefaultPrefixes i -> 0 || _ "." ("^L") [á|a|à|í|i|ì|i2];

# Remove any unmarked, non-tone-bearing vowels (i.e., /i/) from the ends of
# oblique prefixes that immediately precede vowel-initial words (e.g., mi#
# à=_.st'a -> m#à=_.st'a -> màst'a "I am like him/her/it")
define shortenObliquePrefixes i -> 0 || _ "#" vowel;

# Turn any instances of <i2> into plain /i/. (We use <i2> in some TAMA chunks
# to indicate an /i/ that maintains its mora when a prefix is joined to it,
# e.g., the first /i/ in isaà-/isiì- 1PL)
define cleanupMoraicI i2 -> i;

# Turn any remaining instances of <s2> and <s3> into plain /s/.
define cleanupS2S3 [ s2 | s3 ] -> s;

# Remove middle, outer, and oblique-prefix morphological boundary markers from
# the FST output.
define removeNonInnerBoundaryMarkers [ "_" | "=" | "#" ] -> 0;

# Remove inner-prefix morphological boundary markers from the FST output.
define removeInnerBoundaryMarker "." -> 0;


#
# Compose all of the morphophonology together.
#

regex [ encliticMidToHighTone
.o. putLToneAfterInnerPrefixBoundaryMarker
.o. shortenDefaultPrefixes
.o. shortenObliquePrefixes
.o. lToneAfterDisjunctBoundary
.o. removeNonInnerBoundaryMarkers
.o. perfectiveToneLowering
.o. lToneLowering
.o. hToneSpreading
.o. toneSandhi1PL
.o. distributivePluralBefore2PL
.o. iAssimilation
.o. iTAMAAssimilation
.o. uTAMAAssimilation
.o. aTAMAAssimilation
.o. removeInnerBoundaryMarker
.o. cleanupMoraicI
.o. iAssimilation
.o. uGliding
.o. uDeletionBeforeO
.o. assimilationBefore2PL
.o. reduce2PLAfterVowel
.o. lInitialStemsSbjPl2
.o. lInitialStemsSiPFV
.o. cleanupS2S3
.o. iDeletionBeforeOtherVowels
.o. slDissimilation
.o. y2InitialStemAfterS 
.o. aVowelAlternation
.o. noThreeVowelSequences
.o. n2FinalStems
.o. g2FinalStems
.o. zhDevoicing 
.o. zDevoicing
#.o. ghDevoicing
.o. toneSandhi
];
